Utah statutes.
26-8a-251.   Trauma system advisory committee.
(1)  There is created within the department the trauma system advisory
committee.
(2) (a)  The committee shall be comprised of individuals knowledgeable in
adult or pediatric trauma care, including physicians, nurses, hospital
administrators, emergency medical services personnel, government officials,
consumers, and persons affiliated with professional health care associations.
(b)  Representation on the committee shall be broad and balanced among the
health care delivery systems in the state with no more than three
representatives coming from any single delivery system.
(3)  The committee shall:
(a)  advise the department regarding trauma system needs throughout the state;
(b)  assist the department in evaluating the quality and outcomes of the
overall trauma system;
(c)  review and comment on proposals and rules governing the statewide trauma
system; and
(d)  make recommendations for the development of statewide triage, treatment,
transportation, and transfer guidelines.
(4)  The department shall:
(a)  determine, by rule, the term and causes for removal of committee members;
(b)  establish committee procedures and administration policies consistent
with this chapter and department rule; and
(c)  provide administrative support to the committee.
